Washington statutes.
RCW 35.33.107

Adjustment of wages, hours, and conditions of employment.

Notwithstanding the appropriations for any salary, or salary range of any employee or employees adopted in a final budget, the legislative body of any city or town may, by ordinance, change the wages, hours, and conditions of employment of any or all of its appointive employees if sufficient funds are available for appropriation to such purposes.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 95 s 15.]